Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 1135.3, as
last amended by Section 1, Chapter 325, O.S.L. 2025 (47 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1135.3), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1135.3. A. Service Oklahoma is hereby authorized to
design and issue appropriate official special license plates to
persons wishing to demonstrate support, interest or membership to or
for an organization, occupation, cause or other subject as provided
by this section.
Special license plates shall not be transferred to any other
person but shall be removed from the vehicle upon transfer of
ownership and retained. The special license plate may then be used
on another vehicle but only after such other vehicle has been
registered for the current year.
Special license plates shall be renewed each year by Service
Oklahoma or a licensed operator, unless authorized by Service
Oklahoma to be renewed for a period greater than one (1) year.
Service Oklahoma shall notify by mail all persons issued special
license plates. The notice shall contain all necessary information
and shall contain instructions for the renewal procedure upon
presentation to a licensed operator or Service Oklahoma. The
license plates shall be issued on a staggered system.
On and after January 1, 2022, if a special license plate is
issued pursuant to this section, any registration fee required for
ENR. H. B. NO. 4266 Page 2

such plate pursuant to this section and the fee required pursuant to
Section 1132 of this title shall be remitted at the same time and
subject to a single registration period. Service Oklahoma shall
determine, by rule, a method for making required fee and
registration period adjustments if a special license plate is
obtained during a twelve-month period for which a registration fee
has already been remitted pursuant to Section 1132 of this title.
The combination of fees in a single remittance shall not alter the
apportionment otherwise provided for in this section.
Service Oklahoma is hereby directed to develop and implement a
system whereby licensed operators are permitted to accept
applications for special license plates authorized under this
section. The licensed operator shall confirm the applicant's
eligibility, if applicable, collect and deposit any amount
specifically authorized by law, accept and process the necessary
information directly into such system and generate a receipt
accordingly. For performance of these duties, licensed operators
shall retain the fee provided in Section 1141.1 of this title for
registration of a motor vehicle. The licensed operator fees for
acceptance of applications and renewals shall be paid out of the
Oklahoma Tax Commission Reimbursement Fund. Beginning January 1,
2023, the licensed operator fees for acceptance of applications and
renewals shall be paid out of the Service Oklahoma Reimbursement
Fund.
If fewer than one hundred of any type of special license plates
authorized prior to January 1, 2004, are issued prior to January 1,
2006, Service Oklahoma shall discontinue issuance and renewal of
that type of special license plate. Any such authorized special
license plate registrant shall be allowed to display the license
plate upon the designated vehicle until the registration expiration
date. After such time the expired special license plate shall be
removed from the vehicle.
Except as otherwise provided in law, for special license plates
authorized on or after July 1, 2004, no special license plates shall
be developed or issued by Service Oklahoma until Service Oklahoma
receives one hundred (100) prepaid applications therefor. The
prepaid applications must be received by Service Oklahoma within one
hundred eighty (180) days of the effective date of the authorization
or the authority to issue shall be null and void. In the event one
hundred (100) prepaid applications are not received by Service
Oklahoma within such prescribed time period any payment so received
shall be refunded accordingly.
ENR. H. B. NO. 4266 Page 3

B. The special license plates provided by this section are as
follows:
1. Round and Square Dance License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
round and square dancing;
2. National Association for the Advancement of Colored People
License Plate - such plates shall be designed, subject to the
criteria to be presented to Service Oklahoma by the NAACP, and
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the NAACP;
3. National Rifle Association License Plate - such plates shall
be designed, subject to the criteria to be presented to Service
Oklahoma by the National Rifle Association, and issued to any person
wishing to demonstrate support for the National Rifle Association;
4. Masonic Fraternity License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any resident of this state who is a member of
a Masonic Fraternity of Oklahoma. Such persons may apply for a
Masonic Fraternity license plate for each vehicle with a rated
carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less upon proof of a Masonic
Fraternity membership or upon the presentment of an application for
a Masonic Fraternity license plate authorized and approved by the
Grand Lodge of Oklahoma. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Masonic Fraternities of Oklahoma and shall
contain the Masonic emblem;
5. Shriners Hospitals for Children License Plate - such plates
shall be designed to demonstrate support for Shriners Hospitals for
Children and shall be issued to any resident of this state who is a
member of a Shriners Temple in Oklahoma. The license plate shall be
designed in consultation with the Shriners Temples in Oklahoma and
shall contain the Shriners emblem;
6. Balloonists License Plate - such plates shall be designed
and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for hot air
ballooning in this state;
7. Order of the Eastern Star License Plate - such plates shall
be designed and issued to any resident of this state who is a member
of an Order of the Eastern Star. Such persons may apply for an
Order of the Eastern Star license plate for each vehicle with a
rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less upon proof of an
ENR. H. B. NO. 4266 Page 4

Order of the Eastern Star membership or upon the presentment of an
application for an Order of the Eastern Star license plate
authorized and approved by the organization. The license plate
shall be designed in consultation with the Order of the Eastern Star
and shall contain the Order of the Eastern Star emblem;
8. Knights of Columbus License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any resident of this state who is a member of
the Knights of Columbus. Such persons may apply for a Knights of
Columbus license plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying
capacity of one (1) ton or less upon proof of a Knights of Columbus
membership or upon the presentment of an application for a Knights
of Columbus license plate authorized and approved by the
organization. The license plate shall be designed in consultation
with the Knights of Columbus and shall contain the Knights of
Columbus emblem;
9. Jaycees License Plate - such plates shall be designed and
issued to members of the Jaycees. Persons applying for such license
plate must show proof of membership in the Jaycees. The license
plates shall be designed in consultation with the Jaycees;
10. Kiwanis International License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to members of Kiwanis International. Persons
applying for such license plate must show proof of membership in
Kiwanis International. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with Kiwanis International;
11. Certified Public Accountants License Plate - such plates
shall be designed and issued to any resident of this state who is a
Certified Public Accountant. Such persons may apply for a Certified
Public Accountant license plate for each vehicle with a rated
carrying capacity of one (1) ton or less upon proof of status as a
Certified Public Accountant. The license plates shall be designed
in consultation with the Oklahoma Society of Certified Public
Accountants;
12. Civil Emergency Management License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to persons wishing to demonstrate
support for the state civil emergency management system. Persons
applying for such license plate must show proof of official
affiliation by presenting a nonexpired proof of employment,
affiliation or retirement in the form of an identification card or
letter on official letterhead from a municipal, county or state
emergency management department head;
ENR. H. B. NO. 4266 Page 5

13. Civilian Conservation Corps License Plate – such plates
shall be designed, subject to criteria to be presented to Service
Oklahoma, by the Civilian Conservation Corps Association, and issued
to any person wishing to demonstrate support of the Civilian
Conservation Corps;
14. Rotarian License Plate – such plates shall be designed and
issued to any resident of this state who is a member of a Rotary
Club of Oklahoma. Such persons may apply for a Rotarian license
plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying capacity of one (1) ton
or less upon proof of a Rotary Club membership or upon the
presentment of an application for a Rotarian license plate
authorized and approved by a Rotary Club of Oklahoma. The license
plates shall be designed in consultation with the five Rotarian
District Governors and shall contain the Rotarian emblem;
15. Benevolent and Protective Order of Elks License Plate –
such plates shall be designed, subject to criteria to be presented
to Service Oklahoma, by the Benevolent and Protective Order of Elks,
and issued to any resident of this state who is a member of the
Benevolent and Protective Order of Elks;
16. Humane Society License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the Humane Society of the United States. The plates shall be issued
to any person in any combination of numbers and letters from one to
a maximum of seven, as for personalized license plates. The plate
shall contain the official Humane Society logo;
17. Oklahoma Mustang Club License Plate – such plates shall be
designed, subject to criteria to be presented to Service Oklahoma,
by the Oklahoma Mustang Club, and issued to any resident of this
state who is a member of the Oklahoma Mustang Club. Such persons
may apply for an Oklahoma Mustang Club license plate upon
presentment of proof of membership in the Oklahoma Mustang Club.
The plates shall be issued to any person in any combination of
numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for
personalized license plates;
18. American Business Clubs (AMBUCS) License Plate - such
plates shall be designed and issued to members of American Business
Clubs. Persons applying for such license plate must show proof of
membership in AMBUCS. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with American Business Clubs;
ENR. H. B. NO. 4266 Page 6

19. West Point 200th Anniversary License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to commemorate
the Two Hundredth Anniversary of the founding of the United States
Military Academy at West Point, New York. The license plates shall
be designed in consultation with the West Point Society of Central
Oklahoma;
20. Oklahoma Aquarium License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for
the Oklahoma Aquarium. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Oklahoma Aquarium. Subject to the provisions
of subsection A of this section, the Oklahoma Aquarium License Plate
is hereby reauthorized effective November 1, 2021;
21. The Pride of Broken Arrow License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for The Pride of Broken Arrow marching band. The plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Broken Arrow Public School System;
22. Fellowship of Christian Athletes License Plate - such
plates shall be designed in consultation with the Fellowship of
Christian Athletes and issued to members and supporters of the
Fellowship of Christian Athletes;
23. Parrothead Club License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to members and supporters of the Parrothead
Club. The license plate shall be issued to any person in any
combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven as
for personalized license plates;
24. Oklahoma Bicycling Coalition License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person who is a member of the
Oklahoma Bicycling Coalition. The license plates shall be designed
in consultation with the Oklahoma Bicycling Coalition;
25. Electric Lineman License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for
Oklahoma's electric linemen. The license plates shall be designed
in consultation with the Oklahoma Electric Superintendent's
Association;
26. Alpha Kappa Alpha License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person who is a member of Alpha Kappa
Alpha Sorority. The license plates shall be designed in
ENR. H. B. NO. 4266 Page 7

consultation with the Oklahoma Chapter of Alpha Kappa Alpha
Sorority;
27. The National Pan-Hellenic Council Incorporated License
Plate – such plates shall be designed and issued to any person
wishing to demonstrate support to any of the nine sororities and
fraternities recognized by the National Pan-Hellenic Council
Incorporated. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Oklahoma Chapter of the National Pan-Hellenic Council
Incorporated;
28. Organ, Eye and Tissue License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support and
increase awareness for organ, eye and tissue donation. The license
plates shall be designed in consultation with the State Department
of Health;
29. Central Oklahoma Habitat for Humanity License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to persons wishing to
demonstrate support and increase awareness for Habitat for Humanity.
The license plate shall be designed in consultation with Central
Oklahoma Habitat for Humanity;
30. Family Career and Community Leaders of America Incorporated
License Plate - such plates shall be designed and issued to persons
wishing to demonstrate support for Family Career and Community
Leaders of America Incorporated. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with Family Career and Community Leaders of
America Incorporated;
31. Delta Sigma Theta License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person who is a member of Delta Sigma
Theta Sorority. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Oklahoma Chapter of Delta Sigma Theta Sorority
Incorporated;
32. Omega Psi Phi License Plate – such plates shall be designed
and issued to any person who is a member of Omega Psi Phi
Fraternity. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Oklahoma Chapter of Omega Psi Phi Fraternity Incorporated;
33. Alpha Phi Alpha License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person who is a member of Alpha Phi Alpha
Fraternity. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
ENR. H. B. NO. 4266 Page 8

with the Oklahoma Chapter of Alpha Phi Alpha Fraternity
Incorporated;
34. 50th Anniversary of the Interstate System of Highways
License Plate – such plates shall be designed and issued to persons
wishing to commemorate the 50th Anniversary of the Interstate System
of Highways. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with the American Association of State Highway and Transportation
Officials;
35. Kappa Alpha Psi License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person who is a member of Kappa Alpha Psi
Fraternity. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Oklahoma Chapter of Kappa Alpha Psi Fraternity
Incorporated;
36. Sigma Gamma Rho License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person who is a member of Sigma Gamma Rho
Sorority. The license plates shall be designed in consultation with
the Oklahoma Chapter of Sigma Gamma Rho Sorority Incorporated.
Subject to the provisions of subsection A of this section, the Sigma
Gamma Rho License Plate is hereby reauthorized effective November 1,
2013;
37. Multiple Sclerosis License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for
and increase awareness of multiple sclerosis. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Chapter of the
National Multiple Sclerosis Society;
38. Frederick A. Douglass High School License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for Frederick A. Douglass High School located in
Oklahoma City. The plates shall be designed in consultation with
representatives of Frederick A. Douglass High School National Alumni
Association;
39. United States Air Force Academy License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the United States Air Force Academy;
40. In God We Trust License Plate – such plates shall be
designed to include the motto, "In God We Trust", and shall be
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the motto;
ENR. H. B. NO. 4266 Page 9

41. National Weather Center License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for the National Weather Center in Norman. The plates shall be
designed in consultation with representatives of the National
Weather Center Directors;
42. Make-A-Wish Foundation License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for
the Make-A-Wish Foundation. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Oklahoma Chapter of the National Make-A-Wish
Foundation;
43. South Central Section of the PGA Foundation License Plate -
such plates shall be designed and issued to persons wishing to
demonstrate support for the South Central Section of the PGA
Foundation. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with the South Central Section of the PGA Foundation;
44. Putnam City High School License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for Putnam City High School. The plates shall be designed in
consultation with representatives of Putnam City High School Alumni
Association, Inc.;
45. Autism Awareness License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to increase awareness of
autism. The license plate shall be designed in consultation with
the Oklahoma Autism Network;
46. Oklahoma Blood Institute License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for the Oklahoma Blood Institute. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Blood Institute;
47. Zeta Phi Beta and Phi Beta Sigma License Plate - such
plates shall be designed and issued to any person who is a member of
Zeta Phi Beta Sorority or Phi Beta Sigma Fraternity. The license
plates shall be designed in consultation with the Oklahoma chapters
of Zeta Phi Beta Sorority Incorporated and Phi Beta Sigma Fraternity
Incorporated;
48. Star Spencer High School License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for Star Spencer High School located in Oklahoma City. The plates
shall be designed in consultation with representatives of the Star
ENR. H. B. NO. 4266 Page 10

Spencer High School Alumni Association. Subject to the provisions
of subsection A of this section, the Star Spencer High School
License Plate is hereby reauthorized effective November 1, 2015;
49. Northeast High School License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
Northeast High School located in Oklahoma City. The plates shall be
designed in consultation with representatives of the Northeast High
School Alumni Association;
50. Oklahoma City Central High School License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Oklahoma City Central High School Alumni
Association. The plates shall be designed in consultation with
representatives of the Oklahoma City Central High School Alumni
Association;
51. Oklahoma Rifle Association License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the Oklahoma Rifle Association. The plates shall be
designed in consultation with representatives of the Oklahoma Rifle
Association;
52. Oklahoma City Thunder License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the Oklahoma City Thunder. The license plate shall be designed in
consultation with the Oklahoma City Thunder organization;
53. Ovarian Cancer Awareness License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to increase awareness
of ovarian cancer. The license plate shall be designed in
consultation with the HOPE in Oklahoma organization;
54. BMW Car Club of America License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for the BMW Car Club of America. The plates shall be issued to any
person in any combination of numbers and letters from one to a
maximum of seven, as for personalized license plates. The license
plate shall be designed in consultation with the Sunbelt Chapter of
the BMW Car Club of America. Subject to the provisions of
subsection A of this section, the BMW Car Club of America License
Plate is hereby reauthorized effective November 1, 2013;
55. Don't Tread On Me License Plate – such plates shall be
designed to include the yellow background and rattlesnake emblem
ENR. H. B. NO. 4266 Page 11

above the motto "DON'T TREAD ON ME" as found on the historic Gadsden
flag, and shall be issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the freedom and liberty of the Republic;
56. Oklahomans for the Arts License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for arts, culture and creative industries as well as arts education.
The plates shall be designed in consultation with Oklahomans for the
Arts;
57. Tulsa Oilers License Plate – such plates shall be designed
and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the
Tulsa Oilers. The license plate shall be designed in consultation
with the Tulsa Oilers organization;
58. Tulsa Drillers License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the Tulsa Drillers. The license plate shall be designed in
consultation with the Tulsa Drillers organization;
59. Millwood School District License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for the Millwood School District. The license plate shall be
designed in consultation with representatives of the Millwood School
District;
60. Booker T. Washington High School License Plate – such
plates shall be issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for
Booker T. Washington High School and shall be designed in
consultation with the Booker T. Washington High School National
Alumni Association;
61. Oklahoma Current State Flag License Plate – such plates
shall be designed to include the current Oklahoma state flag and
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the current
Oklahoma state flag. The plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Friends of the Oklahoma History Center;
62. Oklahoma Original State Flag License Plate – such plates
shall be designed to include the original Oklahoma state flag and
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the original
Oklahoma state flag. The plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Friends of the Oklahoma History Center. The plates shall
be issued to any person in any combination of numbers and letters
from one to a maximum of seven, as for personalized license plates.
ENR. H. B. NO. 4266 Page 12

Subject to the provisions of subsection A of this section, the
Oklahoma Original State Flag License Plate is hereby reauthorized
effective November 1, 2015;
63. Tulsa 66ers License Plate - such plates shall be designed
and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the
Tulsa 66ers. The plates shall be designed in consultation with the
Tulsa 66ers Organization;
64. Frederick Bombers License Plate – such plates shall be
issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for the Frederick
School District and shall be designed in consultation with
representatives of the Frederick School District;
65. 911 Dispatcher License Plate – such plates shall be issued
to persons wishing to demonstrate support for 911 dispatchers.
Persons applying for such license plate must show proof of current
employment as a 911 dispatcher or sign an attestation that they are
a currently employed or retired 911 dispatcher;
66. Oklahoma Fosters License Plate – such plates shall be
issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for the Oklahoma
Fosters Initiative and shall be designed in consultation with the
Oklahoma Fosters Initiative;
67. Red Dirt Jeep License Plate – such plates shall be designed
and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for Red Dirt
Jeep and such plates shall be designed in consultation with Red Dirt
Jeep, L.L.C.;
68. Sons of the American Revolution License Plate – such plates
shall be issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for the
Sons of the American Revolution for a vehicle or motorcycle in any
combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven,
as for personalized license plates. Such plates shall be designed
in consultation with the Oklahoma Society of the Sons of the
American Revolution. The license plate for a motorcycle may be of
similar design as space permits or a new design in order to meet the
space requirements of a motorcycle license plate;
69. Daughters of the American Revolution License Plate – such
plates shall be issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for
the Daughters of the American Revolution for a vehicle or motorcycle
in any combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of
seven, as for personalized license plates. Such plates shall be
ENR. H. B. NO. 4266 Page 13

designed in consultation with the Oklahoma Society of the Daughters
of the American Revolution. The license plate for a motorcycle may
be of similar design as space permits or a new design in order to
meet the space requirements of a motorcycle license plate;
70. Air Medal License Plate – such plates shall be designed and
issued to Air Medal recipients. An individual requesting the
license plate is required, at the time of application, to show proof
he or she is a recipient of the Air Medal or sign an attestation
stating that he or she is a medal recipient. The plates shall be
designed to include the Air Medal emblem and shall include the words
"Air Medal" on the plate;
71. Oklahoma Institute for Child Advocacy License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Oklahoma Institute for Child Advocacy.
The plates shall be issued to any person in any combination of
numbers and letters from one to a maximum of seven, as for
personalized license plates. The plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Oklahoma Institute for Child Advocacy.
Subject to the provisions of subsection A of this section, the
Oklahoma Institute for Child Advocacy License Plate is hereby
reauthorized effective November 1, 2021;
72. The Pride of Oklahoma Marching Band License Plate – such
plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Pride of Oklahoma marching band. The
plates shall be designed in consultation with the University of
Oklahoma;
73. The Spirit of Oklahoma State Marching Band License Plate –
such plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Spirit of Oklahoma State marching band.
The plates shall be designed in consultation with Oklahoma State
University;
74. Southeast Spartans License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
Southeast High School Spartans and such plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Southeast High School Alumni Association;
75. Catoosa High School License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
Catoosa High School located in Catoosa. The plates shall bear the
ENR. H. B. NO. 4266 Page 14

image of the Catoosa High School mascot and be designed in
consultation with representatives of Catoosa High School;
76. Toastmasters International License Plate - such plates
shall be issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for
Toastmasters International and shall be designed in consultation
with District 16 of Toastmasters International;
77. Millwood High School Alumni License Plate – such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for Millwood High School Alumni. The license plate shall be
designed in consultation with representatives of the Millwood High
School Alumni Association;
78. Patriot Guard Riders License Plate - such plates shall be
issued to persons wishing to demonstrate support for Patriot Guard
Riders and shall be designed in consultation with the Patriot Guard
Riders of Oklahoma;
79. Bixby School District License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the Bixby School District. The license plate shall be designed in
consultation with representatives of the Bixby School District;
80. Oklahoma Renewable Energy License Plate – such plates shall
be designed in consultation with the Advanced Power Alliance and
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for renewable
energy;
81. Scottish Rite Masons License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any resident of this state who is a member of
the Scottish Rite Masons. Such persons may apply for a Scottish
Rite Masons license plate for each vehicle with a rated carrying
capacity of one (1) ton or less upon proof of a Scottish Rite
membership. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Scottish Rite Masons in Oklahoma and shall contain the
Scottish Rite emblem;
82. New State Brand License Plate – such plates shall be
designed, subject to the criteria to be presented to Service
Oklahoma by the Oklahoma Tourism and Recreation Department, and
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the new
Oklahoma brand. The license plates shall contain the new state
brand;
ENR. H. B. NO. 4266 Page 15

83. Tulsa Flag License Plate – such plates shall be designed
and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the City
of Tulsa. The license plates shall be designed in consultation with
the Tulsa Community Foundation;
84. ROAD License Plate – such plates shall be designed and
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for Recovering
Oklahomans After Disaster. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Recovering Oklahomans After Disaster
organization;
85. Tulsa Icon License Plate – such plates shall be designed
and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the
Tulsa community for a vehicle or motorcycle in a pre-numbered format
or any combination of numbers and letters from one to a maximum of
six for vehicles or one to a maximum of five for motorcycles, as for
personalized plates. The plate design for vehicles will include
Tulsa's iconic Golden Driller and Route 66 Rising sculpture. The
license plate for a motorcycle may be of similar design as space
permits or a new design in order to meet the space requirements of a
motorcycle license plate;
86. ORA License Plate – such plates shall be designed and
issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for the Oklahoma
Rifle Association. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Oklahoma Rifle Association;
87. Hallett Motor Racing Circuit License Plate - such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the Hallett Motor Racing Circuit. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with the Hallett Motor Racing
Circuit;
88. University of Kansas License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the University of Kansas. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the University of Kansas and/or the University of
Kansas Alumni Association;
89. Clinton Red Tornadoes License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the Clinton Red Tornadoes. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Clinton Public School System; and
ENR. H. B. NO. 4266 Page 16

90. Tulsa Air and Space Museum and Planetarium License Plate -
such plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Tulsa Air and Space Museum and
Planetarium. The license plates shall be designed in consultation
with the Tulsa Air and Space Museum and Planetarium;
91. Oklahoma State Beekeepers Association License Plate - such
plates shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to
demonstrate support for the Oklahoma State Beekeepers Association.
The license plates shall be designed in consultation with the
Oklahoma State Beekeepers Association;
92. University of Oklahoma License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the University of Oklahoma. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the University of Oklahoma;
93. Oklahoma State University License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for Oklahoma State University. The license plates shall be designed
in consultation with Oklahoma State University;
94. University of Arizona License Plate – such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the University of Arizona. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the University of Arizona;
95. Arizona State University License Plate – such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for Arizona State University. The license plates shall be designed
in consultation with Arizona State University;
96. Baylor University License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
Baylor University. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with Baylor University;
97. Brigham Young University License Plate - such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for Brigham Young University. The license plates shall be designed
in consultation with Brigham Young University;
98. University of Cincinnati License Plate - such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
ENR. H. B. NO. 4266 Page 17

for the University of Cincinnati. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the University of Cincinnati;
99. University of Colorado Boulder License Plate - such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the University of Colorado Boulder. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with the University of Colorado
Boulder;
100. University of Houston License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the University of Houston. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the University of Houston;
101. Iowa State University of Science and Technology License
Plate - such plates shall be designed and issued to any person
wishing to demonstrate support for the Iowa State University of
Science and Technology. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the Iowa State University of Science and
Technology;
102. Kansas State University License Plate - such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for Kansas State University. The license plates shall be designed
in consultation with Kansas State University;
103. Texas Christian University License Plate - such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for Texas Christian University. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with Texas Christian University;
104. Texas Tech University License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
Texas Tech University. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with Texas Tech University;
105. University of Central Florida License Plate - such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the University of Central Florida. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with the University of Central
Florida;
106. University of Utah License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
ENR. H. B. NO. 4266 Page 18

the University of Utah. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the University of Utah;
107. West Virginia University License Plate - such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for West Virginia University. The license plates shall be designed
in consultation with West Virginia University;
108. University of Alabama License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the University of Alabama. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the University of Alabama;
109. University of Arkansas License Plate - such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for the University of Arkansas. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the University of Arkansas;
110. Auburn University License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
Auburn University. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with Auburn University;
111. University of Florida License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the University of Florida. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the University of Florida;
112. University of Georgia License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
the University of Georgia. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with the University of Georgia;
113. University of Kentucky License Plate - such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for the University of Kentucky. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the University of Kentucky;
114. Louisiana State University of Agricultural and Mechanical
College License Plate - such plates shall be designed and issued to
any person wishing to demonstrate support for Louisiana State
University of Agricultural and Mechanical College. The license
plates shall be designed in consultation with Louisiana State
University of Agricultural and Mechanical College;
ENR. H. B. NO. 4266 Page 19

115. Mississippi State University License Plate - such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for Mississippi State University. The license plates shall
be designed in consultation with Mississippi State University;
116. University of Missouri License Plate - such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for the University of Missouri. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the University of Missouri;
117. University of Mississippi License Plate - such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the University of Mississippi. The license plates shall
be designed in consultation with the University of Mississippi;
118. University of South Carolina License Plate - such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the University of South Carolina. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with the University of South
Carolina;
119. University of Tennessee License Plate - such plates shall
be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support
for the University of Tennessee. The license plates shall be
designed in consultation with the University of Tennessee;
120. Texas A&M University License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
Texas A&M University. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with Texas A&M University;
121. University of Texas at Austin License Plate - such plates
shall be designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate
support for the University of Texas at Austin. The license plates
shall be designed in consultation with the University of Texas at
Austin; and
122. Vanderbilt University License Plate - such plates shall be
designed and issued to any person wishing to demonstrate support for
Vanderbilt University. The license plates shall be designed in
consultation with Vanderbilt University.
C. The fee for such plates shall be Fifteen Dollars ($15.00)
per year of renewal and shall be in addition to all other
registration fees provided by the Oklahoma Vehicle License and
ENR. H. B. NO. 4266 Page 20

Registration Act. Unless otherwise provided in this section, the
fee shall be apportioned as follows: Eight Dollars ($8.00) per year
of renewal of the special license plate fee shall be deposited in
the Tax Commission Reimbursement Fund to be used for the
administration of the Oklahoma Vehicle License and Registration Act
and the remaining Seven Dollars ($7.00) per year of renewal of the
special license plate fee shall be apportioned as provided in
Section 1104 of this title. Beginning January 1, 2023, Eight
Dollars ($8.00) per year of renewal of the special license plate fee
shall be deposited in the Service Oklahoma Reimbursement Fund to be
used for the administration of the Oklahoma Vehicle License and
Registration Act and the remaining Seven Dollars ($7.00) per year of
renewal of the special license plate fee shall be apportioned as
provided in Section 1104 of this title.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 4266 Page 21

Passed the House of Representatives the 11th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 23rd day of April, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 4266 Page 22